Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.010

Corporate powers.

A school district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a public corporation, and in that name and style may sue and be sued and transact all business necessary for maintaining school and protecting the rights of the district, and enter into such obligations as are authorized therefor by law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.010. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 287 s 7, part; RRS s 4782, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 44, part; 1891 c 127 s 11, part; 1890 p 366 s 30, part. Formerly RCW 28.58.040, part. (ii) 1947 c 266 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-25, part; prior: 1909 c 97 p 265 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.010, 28.57.135, 28.58.010.]